Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 660.300 is amended to read:
660.300. As used in ORS 660.300 to 660.364:
(1) “Chief elected official” means a county commissioner, a county judge  or the mayor of the
City of Portland.
(2) “Federal Act” or “federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act” means  the federal
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq.).
(3) “Local workforce development  area” means the City of Portland or a county when the city
or county has been designated as  a local workforce development area under ORS 660.324. “Local
workforce development area” may include two or more counties that have joined  together to form
a local workforce  development area and that have been designated as a local workforce development
area under ORS 660.324.
(4) “Local workforce development board” means a board  established pursuant to section 3122
of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.
(5) “Maritime sector” includes but is not limited to:
(a) Enterprises engaged in the design, construction, manufacture, acquisition, operation, supply,
repair or maintenance of marine vessels or component parts of marine vessels;
(b) Enterprises engaged in managing or operating shipping lines;
(c) Customs  brokerage services, shipyards, shipping and freight forwarding services, dry docks,
marine railways and marine repair shops;
(d) Enterprises engaged in commercial or recreational fishing;
(e) Enterprises and academic institutions engaged in scientific  research of ocean processes,
marine life or other ocean resources; and
(f) Enterprises engaged in  marine tours or travel, water sports or other marine leisure activities.
(6) “Participant”  means a person receiving services under the federal Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq.).
(7) “Participant records” means records relating to matters such  as grades, conduct, personal
and academic evaluations, results of psychometric testing,  counseling, disciplinary actions, if any,
and other personal matters.
(8) “Priority populations” means:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-B) Page 1
(a) Communities of color;
(b) Women;
(c) Low-income communities;
(d) Rural and frontier communities;
(e) Veterans;
(f) Persons with disabilities;
(g) Incarcerated and formerly incarcerated individuals;
(h) Members of Oregon’s nine federally recognized Indian tribes;
(i) Individuals who disproportionately experience discrimination  in employment on the
basis of age; and
(j) Individuals who identify as members of the LGBTQ+ community.
[(8)] (9) “State workforce agencies” means state agencies that administer workforce programs.
[(9)] (10) “Workforce development” means services designed to help individuals attain  employ-
ment and progress along career pathways and to help businesses  better achieve business goals by
more easily finding skilled employees. “Workforce development” includes:
(a) Education[ ,] and training [ and apprenticeship ] services;
(b) Apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training  programs registered with the State
Apprenticeship and Training Council;
[(b)] (c) Labor market analysis;
[(c)] (d) Employment and reemployment services;
[(d)] (e) Employee recruitment and retention services; and
[(e)] (f) Convening, coordinating, oversight and  evaluation services for business and state
workforce agencies.
[(10)] (11) “Workforce programs” means programs that have a primary mission  of helping indi-
viduals become  employed, retain employment, increase wages and progress along career pathways
and that are responsible for outcomes related to the primary mission.
SECTION 2.
Sections 3, 9, 10, 11 and 12 of this 2022 Act are added to and made a part of
ORS 660.300 to 660.364.
SECTION 3. Local workforce development boards.  (1) The Prosperity  10,000 Program is
established in the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for the following purposes:
(a) To provide career coaching, occupational training and job placement services;
(b) To provide wraparound supports and services that are necessary to  facilitate reen-
gagement in the workforce, including, but not limited to, transportation, child  care and
rental assistance;
(c) To provide paid work experiences, including stipends and  wages and other income
supports for individuals from priority populations; and
(d) To support targeted recruitment and engagement efforts.
(2) The goals of the Prosperity 10,000 Program are to:
(a) Include at least 10,000 total individuals who participate in the program;
(b) Improve the capacity and responsiveness  of the public workforce system in this state
by providing assistance for workforce development  program navigation, expanding access to
community-based career counseling and wraparound supports and services, and providing
opportunities to earn industry-recognized certificates, credentials and  degrees through
work-based learning experiences;
(c) Ensure that services and  benefits available through workforce programs are provided
to individuals from priority populations;
(d) Provide increased access for priority populations to services and benefits  available
through workforce programs;
(e) Ensure that at least 50 percent of the individuals who participate in the  program are
women;
(f) Ensure that at least 80 percent of the individuals who  participate successfully com-
plete the program;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-B) Page 2
(g) Ensure that at least 75  percent of the individuals who participate in the program
successfully obtain employment; and
(h) Ensure that at least 75  percent of the individuals who participate in the program earn
at least $17 per hour.
(3)(a) The Prosperity 10,000 Program shall be administered by local workforce develop-
ment boards. The local workforce development boards shall:
(A) Distribute resources and  available funds to nonprofit community-based organizations,
educational institutions, labor organizations and  other workforce service providers to facili-
tate the provision of workforce development services and wraparound  supports to individuals
who participate in the program;
(B) Coordinate with state workforce agencies and other workforce  partners to expand
regional community-based  partnerships that work to support and sustain workforce devel-
opment services and wraparound supports; and
(C) Connect with businesses and organizations in targeted  industry sectors to identify
training needs and ensure that business needs relating to a skilled workforce are met.
(b) An entity that collaborates with a local  workforce development board to accomplish
the workforce development activities described  under this subsection shall, in accordance
with ORS 660.327, participate  with local workforce development boards in developing a pro-
posed local plan.
(4)(a) As used in this subsection, “SNAP Employment and Training Program”  means the
employment and training component of the federal Supplemental Nutrition  Assistance Pro-
gram under 7 U.S.C. 2015(d)(4).
(b) To the extent possible, the Department of Human Services shall:
(A) Incorporate the Prosperity 10,000 Program  into the statewide plan for the SNAP
Employment and Training Program;
(B) Seek federal  reimbursement for 50 percent of the Prosperity 10,000 Program’s costs
and for other eligible activities as reported by the local workforce development boards;
(C) Refer individuals who receive  supplemental nutrition assistance under ORS 411.806
to 411.845 to participate in the Prosperity 10,000 Program; and
(D) Distribute moneys received as reimbursement under subparagraph  (B) of this para-
graph to local workforce development boards,  not later than 60 days after the department
receives an invoice that is consistent with requirements under the SNAP Employment and
Training Program,  for reinvestment in workforce development and wraparound supports and
services provided under the Prosperity 10,000 Program.
(5) The State Workforce  and Talent Development Board, in consultation with the Com-
mittee for Continuous Improvement, shall:
(a) Oversee the progress of the Prosperity 10,000 Program;
(b) Ensure that program goals are met; and
(c) Identify areas for program improvement.
SECTION 3a.
Distribution of funds and  reporting. (1)(a) Not later than 60 days following
the effective date of this 2022 Act, the Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall dis-
tribute the funds specifically appropriated  to the commission under section 13 of this 2022
Act to local workforce development boards to administer the Prosperity 10,000 Program.
(b) The commission shall distribute all moneys  received from moneys made available
under sections 13 and 14 of this 2022 Act to local  workforce development boards using the
same formula as required under the  federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29
U.S.C. 3101 et seq.) for the allocation of funds to local workforce development boards.
(2) Each local workforce development board shall compile data on the progress made  to-
ward carrying out the  Prosperity 10,000 Program. The boards shall prepare and submit a
joint report that includes data, disaggregated by race, gender  and geography, to the com-
mission and the State Workforce and Talent Development Board no  later than October 31
of each year, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-B) Page 3
SECTION 4. Post-secondary career pathways.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based organization” includes:
(A) Nonprofit organizations that are representative of a particular  community or specific
segments of a community  and that are located within or in close proximity to the community
served by the organization; and
(B) Culturally specific organizations.
(b) “Community college” has the meaning given that term in ORS 341.005.
(c) “Culturally specific organization” means an organization that  serves a particular
cultural community, that is primarily staffed and led by members  of that community and
that demonstrates intimate knowledge  of the lived experience of that community, including,
but not limited to:
(A) The impact of racism or discrimination on the community;
(B) Specific disparities in  access to services and resources experienced by the commu-
nity; and
(C) Community strengths, cultural practices, beliefs and traditions.
(d) “Local workforce development board” has the meaning given that term in  ORS
660.300.
(e) “Priority populations” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.300.
(f) “Self-sufficiency standard” means a measure of income adequacy, calculated  for each
county in this state, that is based on the costs of basic needs of working families of various
sizes and compositions,  including, but not limited to, food, housing, child care, transportation
and health care, plus taxes  and tax credits, and that describes the amount of income that
is needed for a family to cover such costs without public or private assistance.
(2) There is established a program in the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission for
the purpose of making  grants to community colleges for the development of post-secondary
career pathway training programs that provide individuals from  priority populations with
opportunities to obtain the necessary skills for securing a job or career  advancement in
high-wage, high-demand industries and occupations.
(3) At a minimum, a post-secondary career pathway training program  developed under
this section must:
(a) Provide support for program participants to:
(A) Successfully complete the program;
(B) Earn a certificate, credential  or degree recognized by a targeted industry sector; and
(C) Successfully obtain employment and receive income that is  on a clearly defined
pathway to meet the self-sufficiency standard for  the particular county within which the
program participant is employed; and
(b) Reduce disparities experienced by priority populations in securing gainful employment
or obtaining career advancement.
(4) A recipient of grant moneys under this section may use the funds to:
(a) Connect with priority populations to provide  meaningful access to the post-secondary
career pathway training programs developed under this section;
(b) Collaborate with  community-based organizations, kindergarten through grade 12
schools, local workforce development boards,  employers, workforce education and training
providers and other workforce development organizations to achieve the fullest  possible
participation in the post-secondary career pathway training programs;
(c) Employ a rigorous assessment strategy to determine the efficacy of the programs;
(d) Procure up-to-date  training equipment, technology and other supplies to provide a
modernized training experience for program participants; and
(e) Identify opportunities to leverage the use of  other funding sources, including oppor-
tunities to leverage matching federal funds.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-B) Page 4
(5) The  commission shall determine the process for applying for grants under this sec-
tion, the standards and criteria  for awarding grants and the general terms and conditions
of the grants.
(6) To  be eligible to receive a grant award under this section, a community college must
demonstrate, in an application to the commission, that  the community college has the ability
to effectively engage with and respond to the needs of individuals from priority populations.
(7) The commission may adopt rules necessary to  implement the provisions of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 5. Section 6 of  this 2022 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 660.002 to
660.210.
SECTION 6. Registered apprenticeships. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based organization” has the meaning given that term in section 4  of this
2022 Act.
(b) “Local  workforce development board” has the meaning given that term in ORS
660.300.
(c) “Priority populations” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.300.
(2) The Bureau of Labor and Industries shall establish  and administer a grant program
to provide financial support for the development,  expansion and implementation of registered
apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training programs in health care and manufacturing,
and for  the development and implementation of preapprenticeship training programs in con-
struction.
(3) The State Apprenticeship and Training Council, under the direction  of the Appren-
ticeship and Training Division of  the Bureau of Labor and Industries, may award grants to
community-based organizations, labor organizations, local workforce development boards and
other entities that develop apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training programs described
under subsection (2) of this section and that  prioritize program participation by apprentices
from priority populations.
(4) The Apprenticeship and Training Division of the Bureau of Labor and Industries shall,
in collaboration with the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, recommend for ap-
proval by the council:
(a) The criteria and standards by  which the entities described under subsection (3) of this
section may submit proposals to receive a grant under this section.
(b) The grant proposals to consider in awarding grants.
(5) The council shall award grants under this  section on a competitive basis and may give
priority to grant proposals that demonstrate effective strategies for engaging with priority
populations.
(6) A recipient of a grant under this section may use the moneys:
(a) To pay the costs of convening employers in health care and manufacturing;
(b) To recruit and conduct outreach for apprentices;
(c) To provide tuition and fee assistance to program participants;
(d) To pay the costs of tools, supplies and equipment and other training-related costs;
(e) To pay for technology supports, including broadband services;
(f) To provide apprentices with supports  and services that are equivalent to the supports
and services available to apprentices who perform work on a bridge or highway project;
(g) To  develop uniform standards for new registered apprenticeship and preapprentice-
ship training programs described under subsection (2) of this section;
(h) To develop a curriculum and standard courses  of study for the instruction of ap-
prentices; and
(i) For any other activities that the bureau deems necessary to support the  expansion
of registered apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training programs  and to support overall
increased program participation, with an emphasis on increased participation by women and
individuals from communities of color.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-B) Page 5
(7) The bureau may adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
(8) Each grant recipient shall track and report to the  council information regarding the
status of each apprenticeship  and preapprenticeship program developed, expanded and im-
plemented under this section and the use of grant funds.
SECTION 7.
Youth programs.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Priority populations” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.300.
(b) “Youth workforce program” includes:
(A) A youth reengagement program described under ORS 417.859.
(B) A program  administered by the Youth Development Division of the Department of
Education that delivers workforce readiness services to out-of-school or unemployed  youth
and young adults between 14 years of age and 24 years of age who are from  priority popu-
lations.
(2) The department shall develop and administer a grant program to  award grants to
entities that provide youth and young  adults from priority populations with increased access
to youth workforce programs.
(3) The department may award grants, in addition  to and not in lieu of any other grants,
to entities to provide:
(a) Paid work experiences for program participants.
(b) Workforce readiness training.
(c) Job placement services.
(4) The department shall establish criteria and standards by  which an entity may submit
a proposal to receive a grant under this section. The  department shall award grants under
this section using  an evaluation process that may give priority to proposals that demonstrate
effective strategies for  outreach and increased participation in youth workforce programs
by youth and young adults from priority populations.
SECTION 8.
Prior learning credit.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community college” has the meaning given that term in ORS 341.005.
(b) “Priority populations” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.300.
(c) “University” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(B) Oregon Health and Science University.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating  Commission shall establish a grant program to
award grants to community colleges and  universities that work toward increasing opportu-
nities for students from priority populations to receive  academic credit for prior experience
or skills gained outside of traditional higher education institutions, with such  academic
credit counting toward a certificate or credential that provides a pathway  to employment or
career advancement.
(3) In administering the  grant program under this section, the commission shall consult
with employers and targeted industry  consortia to develop uniform standards that may be
used to certify whether a student’s technical competency, qualifications, knowledge  or skills
are sufficient to earn a certificate or credential recognized by a targeted industry sector.
(4) A recipient of grant moneys under this section may use the funds:
(a) To develop assessment criteria and practices that may be used to  evaluate whether
a student’s prior experience or skills may count  toward earning a certificate or credential
recognized by a targeted industry sector;
(b) To train staff on how to apply the assessment criteria and practices in  awarding
credit for prior experience and skills; and
(c) For recruitment of and outreach to priority populations.
(5) The commission shall establish  criteria and standards by which a community college
or university  may submit a proposal to receive a grant under this section. The commission
shall award grants under this section on a competitive  basis, and may give priority to pro-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-B) Page 6
posals that demonstrate  effective strategies for engaging with individuals from priority pop-
ulations.
(6) The commission may adopt any rules necessary for the implementation  of the pro-
visions of this section.
SECTION 9. Workforce ready grants.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based organization” has the meaning given that term in section 4  of this
2022 Act.
(b) “Community college” has the meaning given that term in ORS 341.005.
(c) “Workforce service provider” includes:
(A) Nonprofit and public workforce education, training and career services providers.
(B) Governmental entities that are providers of workforce development services.
(2) There is established  in the Higher Education Coordinating Commission a program to
award grants to workforce service providers  and community-based organizations that ad-
minister workforce programs  in the health care, manufacturing and technology industry
sectors and that prioritize equitable program participation by individuals from priority pop-
ulations.
(3) The commission  shall establish criteria and standards by which a workforce service
provider or a community-based organization may  submit a proposal to receive a grant under
this section.  In establishing criteria and standards, the commission shall consider federal
nondiscrimination and equal opportunity provisions of the Workforce Innovation and  Op-
portunity Act. The commission shall award grants on a competitive basis, taking into  con-
sideration proposals that:
(a) Describe  how the workforce service provider or the community-based organization
intends to  engage with employers in the targeted industry sectors to provide workforce de-
velopment opportunities to individuals from priority populations.
(b) Demonstrate the workforce  service provider’s or the community-based organization’s
experience serving individuals from priority populations.
(c) Describe how the workforce service provider or the community-based organization
intends to collaborate with one or more of the following entities to  increase accessibility for
priority populations to workforce programs and opportunities:
(A) Other workforce service providers or community-based organizations;
(B) Kindergarten through grade 12 schools;
(C) Community colleges;
(D) Education and training partners;
(E) Local workforce development boards;
(F) Economic development organizations;
(G) Industry associations; and
(H) Universities, as defined in section 8 of this 2022 Act.
(d) Demonstrate that a workforce partner with which a workforce  service provider or a
community-based organization intends to partner possesses specific qualifications, including
the organizational and technical capacity, necessary to  carry out the purposes described
under subsection (5)(a) to (d) of this section.
(e) Prioritize opportunities to leverage the use of  other funding sources, including federal
funds and private sector contributions, toward workforce programs and opportunities.
(4) In awarding grants under this section, the commission shall  consult with the State
Workforce and Talent Development Board and shall incorporate input from local workforce
development boards and industry consortia convened under section 10 of this 2022 Act.
(5) Grant moneys awarded under this section shall be expended for one or more of the
following purposes:
(a) To provide paid work experience, including stipends and wages;
(b) To offer tuition and fee assistance for workforce programs;
(c) To provide wraparound workforce development services;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-B) Page 7
(d) To develop  culturally and linguistically specific career pathways for obtaining certif-
icates, credentials or degrees recognized by targeted industry sectors; and
(e) To fund organizational investments, including, but not limited to:
(A) Hiring staff;
(B) Developing organizational development strategies;
(C) Purchasing equipment, technology or other training-related supplies;
(D) Covering administrative costs; and
(E) Any  other activities identified in a grant proposal as necessary to administer
workforce programs described under this section.
(6) The commission shall compile information from each recipient of a grant under  this
section regarding the status and use of grant funds to ensure funding is  expended for per-
missible purposes. At a minimum, the information must include, where applicable:
(a) The number of individuals who have registered for or completed a  workforce program
in health care, manufacturing or technology;
(b) The number of workforce programs developed and  administered by a workforce ser-
vice provider or a community-based organization;
(c) The job placement rate for and income earnings by individuals participating  in a
workforce program described under this section;
(d) The number of individuals from  priority populations who receive services or benefits
from workforce programs administered by a workforce service  provider or a community-
based organization; and
(e) A description of the types and amount  of wraparound workforce development services
provided by a workforce service provider or a community-based organization.
(7) The commission may adopt any rules necessary  for carrying out the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 10.
Industry consortia.  (1) As used in this section, “community-based organ-
ization” has the meaning given that term in section 4 of this 2022 Act.
(2)(a) The Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, in consultation with the State
Workforce and Talent Development  Board, shall establish a program to convene statewide
industry consortia that represent the  health care, manufacturing and technology industry
sectors. Each individual  consortium established under this section shall represent a single
targeted industry sector.
(b) The purpose of the program is to:
(A) Establish strategic partnerships  to align workforce development activities that aim
to increase participation in workforce programs by individuals from priority populations;
(B) Develop structured processes to address mutual goals and promote consensus in
decision-making;
(C) Identify industry-specific workforce  needs in this state, including the need for high-
value credentials, to inform the development and  implementation of culturally and linguis-
tically diverse workforce education and training curricula;
(D) Develop targeted recruitment strategies to increase  equitable participation by indi-
viduals from priority populations in statewide workforce programs; and
(E) Promote workforce development programs and  activities in the targeted industry
sectors.
(3)(a) An industry  consortium established under this section shall operate under the di-
rection of a leadership team composed of  the following representatives from the
consortium’s targeted industry sector:
(A) A representative who is a business leader.
(B) A  representative of a community-based organization that administers one or more
workforce programs.
(C) One or more representatives of workforce education and training providers.
(D) A representative of a labor organization.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-B) Page 8
(b) To the extent practicable, members of the  leadership team shall include individuals
who are representative of priority populations.
(c) The membership of an industry consortium established under this  section must in-
clude, in addition to the members of the leadership team, the following:
(A) One or more representatives from the State Workforce and Talent  Development
Board.
(B) One or more representatives of the Racial Justice Council  within the Office of the
Governor.
(C) One or more representatives of employers.
(D) One or more representatives of an industry association.
(E) One or more representatives of labor organizations.
(F) One or more representatives of local workforce development boards.
(G) One or more representatives of economic developers.
(4) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board,  or any other neutral entity
designated by the board, shall serve as the  intermediary between the industry consortia
members.
(5) The  commission may adopt any rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 11.
Workforce benefits navigators.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based organization” has the meaning given that term in section 4  of this
2022 Act.
(b) “Comprehensive one-stop center” has the meaning  given that term in 34 C.F.R.
361.305.
(c) “Workforce benefits navigator” means an individual who:
(A) Is employed  at a comprehensive one-stop center or a community-based organization
to advise and assist individuals from priority populations  in accessing workforce programs
and applying for benefits and services that are available under the programs;
(B) Has comprehensive  knowledge and understanding of workforce programs and the
benefits and services that are available under those programs;
(C) Is aware of the cultural and linguistic differences  of individuals from priority popu-
lations, including knowledge of the lived experiences of such individuals; and
(D) Is trained in trauma-informed practices.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission,  in consultation with the State
Workforce and Talent Development Board,  shall establish and administer a program to
award grants for pilot projects implemented  by local workforce development boards that
partner with comprehensive one-stop centers or community-based organizations  to employ
a workforce benefits navigator to connect individuals  from priority populations to workforce
programs and to increase access for such individuals  to services and benefits made available
under those workforce programs.
(3) The commission shall establish criteria  and standards by which local workforce de-
velopment boards may submit proposals to receive a grant under this section.
(4) The commission may adopt any rules necessary  for carrying out the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 12.
Assessment and accountability.  (1) The Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, in collaboration with the State Workforce and Talent  Development Board, the
Bureau of Labor and Industries  and the Department of Education, shall review each of the
programs established under sections 3, 4, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10  and 11 of this 2022 Act to assess per-
formance and expenditure outcomes of the programs. In  evaluating the programs, the com-
mission shall compile the following information:
(a) For the programs established under sections 3, 4, 6, 8, 9, 10 and 11 of this 2022 Act:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-B) Page 9
(A) The number of individuals from priority populations who have registered for and who
have completed a workforce program, including apprenticeship and  preapprenticeship train-
ing programs;
(B) Data on  job placement rates, wages and salary earnings and health and retirement
benefits provided for individuals who participated in an established program;
(C) A description of any new or expanded workforce  programs, including training pro-
grams, career pathway programs and apprenticeship and preapprenticeship  training pro-
grams, established as a result of the programs described under sections 3, 4, 6, 8, 9, 10 and
11 of this 2022 Act; and
(D) The  types and amounts of any wraparound supports and services provided to indi-
viduals from priority populations.
(b) For the program established under section 7 of this 2022 Act:
(A) The number of youth or young adults  from priority populations who have registered
for or completed a youth workforce program;
(B) Data on job  placement rates for youth or young adults from priority populations who
have completed a youth workforce program; and
(C) A  description of any new or expanded paid work experiences, workforce readiness
training or job placement services created as a result of grants awarded under section  7 of
this 2022 Act.
(2) In carrying out the duties described  under subsection (1) of this section, the com-
mission shall coordinate its activities with relevant state  agencies and other workforce
partners to:
(a) Identify opportunities for leveraging existing partnerships to align  data collection
standards and practices and to integrate data with any  common data system among those
partnerships;
(b) Support the commission’s assessment efforts and identify areas for future  workforce
development investments; and
(c) Facilitate communication with workforce stakeholders, including but not limited to
job seekers, employers,  community-based organizations and workforce service providers, in
an inclusive manner and, when appropriate, provide stakeholders with access to  the results
and findings resulting from the commission’s review.
(3) By December 31 of each year, the commission shall prepare  and submit a report that
includes the information described  in subsection (1) of this section, disaggregated by race,
age, gender and  geographical area, including any recommendations for future investments
and opportunities to leverage private and federal funding  to support investments, to the
Governor and to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to workforce
development, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245.  In addition to including the information
described under subsection (1) of this section, the report shall:
(a) Provide baseline estimates of statewide  labor force participation rates that include,
at a minimum:
(A) Long-term employment projections for health care and manufacturing;
(B) The progress made  toward achieving the statewide educational attainment goals es-
tablished under ORS 350.014 and 350.018; and
(C) Projections related to post-secondary educational attainment needs; and
(b) Describe how the programs established under sections 3, 4, 6, 8,  9, 10 and 11 of this
2022 Act contributed to statewide labor force  participation by demonstrating, at a minimum,
the following:
(A) The percentage of individuals who participated in an established program as  com-
pared to the share of the statewide labor force, by race;
(B) The percentage of individuals who participated in an established program as com-
pared to the share of the statewide labor force, by gender;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-B) Page 10
(C) The percentage of individuals who participated  in an established program and who
received a post-secondary certificate,  credential or degree as compared to the share of the
statewide labor force, disaggregated by race, age, gender and geographical area;
(D) The number of individuals who participated  in an established program and who re-
ceived a post-secondary certificate,  credential or degree as compared to the statewide edu-
cational attainment goals described under ORS 350.014 and 350.018,  disaggregated by race,
age, gender and geographical area; and
(E) The job placement rates of individuals who participated in  an established program as
compared to long-term employment projections for health care and manufacturing, disag-
gregated by race, age, gender and geographical area.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based organization” has the meaning given that term in section 4  of this
2022 Act.
(b) “Workforce service provider” has the meaning given that term in section  9 of this
2022 Act.
(c) “Youth workforce program” has the meaning given that term in section 7 of this  2022
Act.
APPROPRIATIONS
(Higher Education Coordinating Commission)
SECTION 13.
General Fund appropriation.  In addition to and not in  lieu of any other
appropriation, there is  appropriated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $15,000,000 for
carrying out the provisions of sections 3 and 3a of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 14. ARPA expenditures. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,
the amount of $20,000,000 is established  for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maxi-
mum limit for payment of expenses by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  from
American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus  State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the commission,  for car-
rying out the provisions of sections 3 and 3a of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 15. General Fund appropriation.  In addition to and not in lieu of any other
appropriation, there is appropriated to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $37,385,390 for
carrying out the provisions of sections 4, 8, 9, 10 and 12 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 16. ARPA expenditures. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,
the amount of $95,000,000 is established for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, as the maxi-
mum limit for payment of expenses by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  from
American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund  moneys received by the
Oregon Department of  Administrative Services and transferred to the commission, for car-
rying out the provisions of sections 9 and 11 of this 2022 Act.
(Department of Human Services)
SECTION 17. General Fund appropriation. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the General Fund  appropriation made to the Department of Human Services by section 1 (3),
chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for self-sufficiency
programs, is increased by $1,746,643 to implement the requirements of sections  3 and 3a of
this 2022 Act.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Department of Human Services by section 1 (7), chapter 606, Oregon Laws  2021, for the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-B) Page 11
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for  intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is in-
creased by $123,721 to implement the requirements of sections 3 and 3a of this 2022 Act.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Department of Human  Services by section 1 (2), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,  is increased
by $79,932 to implement the requirements of sections 3 and 3a of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 18. Federal funds limitation. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expendi-
tures, the  limitation on expenditures established by section 3 (7), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, collected or received  by the Department of Human Services, for
intellectual/development disabilities programs, is increased by $123,335 to implement the  re-
quirements of sections 3 and 3a of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 19.
Federal funds limitation. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expendi-
tures, the limitation on expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 606, Oregon  Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, collected or received by the Department of Human Services, for  state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is  increased by $79,426 to implement the requirements of sections 3
and 3a of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 20.
Other funds  limitation.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expendi-
tures, the limitation on expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter 606, Oregon  Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys  or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts
and including federal funds for indirect  cost recovery, Social Security Supplemental Security
Income recoveries and the Child Care and  Development Fund, but excluding lottery funds
and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,  collected or re-
ceived by the Department of Human Services, for shared services, is increased by $159,358.
(Oregon Health Authority)
SECTION 21. General Fund appropriation.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the General Fund appropriation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1),
chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for health systems,
health policy  and analytics, and public health is increased by $164,314 for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of sections 3 and 3a of this 2022 Act.
(Bureau of Labor and Industries)
SECTION 22.
General Fund appropriation.  In addition to and not in lieu of any other
appropriation, there is appropriated to the Bureau of Labor and Industries, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $18,900,000 for carrying out the
provisions of section 6 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 23.
ARPA expenditures.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,
the amount of $1,100,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maxi-
mum limit for payment of expenses  by the Bureau of Labor and Industries from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund  moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the  bureau, for carrying out the
provisions of section 6 of this 2022 Act.
(Department of Education)
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-B) Page 12
SECTION 24. General Fund appropriation. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the General Fund appropriation made to the Department of  Education by section 1 (1),
chapter 603, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for operations, is in-
creased by $186,571 for carrying out the provisions of section 7 of this 2022 Act.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Department of  Education by section 2 (6), chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for youth development programs,  is increased by $3,313,429
for carrying out the provisions of section 7 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 25. ARPA expenditures.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,
the amount of $7,000,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maxi-
mum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of Education from American  Rescue
Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received by the  Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services and transferred to the department,  for carrying out the
provisions of section 7 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 26. The unit and section captions used in this 2022 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law  of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 27. Effective date.  This  2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preserva-
tion of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2022
Act takes effect on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 1, 2022
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-B) Page 13